Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.036] SCHOOL DE-ESCALATION TRAINING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Annual training opportunity. new text end new text begin (a) All school personnel in Minnesota public, private, and charter schools, including teachers, administrators, building staff, and support staff, must have access to annual training on creating safe and inclusive environments using evidence-based best practices on relationship-building and de-escalation strategies. School personnel are encouraged but not required to complete the training. Schools are encouraged to integrate the training into existing professional development programs and schedules to maximize accessibility. Schools that implement the training may be eligible for priority consideration for state professional development aid and other funding opportunities, provided the training meets state-established requirements. new text end new text begin (b) The training must equip school personnel with the knowledge and skills necessary to foster a positive school culture, prevent conflicts, and appropriately respond to escalated situations. Schools are encouraged to adopt policies that support widespread participation and ensure that all staff have access to ongoing learning on relationship-building and de-escalation strategies. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Recommended training components. new text end new text begin (a) Training on relationship-building may include but is not limited to the following components: new text end new text begin (1) professional learning to develop relational skills that strengthen positive interactions with students, families, and colleagues; new text end new text begin (2) the role of positive relationships in student academic and social-emotional success; new text end new text begin (3) strategies to cultivate a positive school culture that is inclusive of family and community engagement; new text end new text begin (4) commitment to fostering mutual respect, inclusion, and belonging among students and staff; new text end new text begin (5) effective communication practices that emphasize open, honest, and culturally responsive engagement; new text end new text begin (6) co-construction of school vision and mission in collaboration with families and the broader school community; new text end new text begin (7) policies and practices that align with the diverse needs of the student population; and new text end new text begin (8) school discipline practices that prioritize restorative approaches and learning opportunities over punitive measures. new text end new text begin (b) Training on de-escalation strategies may include but is not limited to the following components: new text end new text begin (1) an understanding of Multi-Tiered Systems of Supports in the school setting; new text end new text begin (2) training on self-regulation; and new text end new text begin (3) training on the phases of escalation including prevention, escalation, agitation, acceleration, crisis, and recovery or restoration. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education to provide grants to school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units to support the implementation of school personnel relationship-building and de-escalation training programs under section 121A.036. new text end